Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-121 Coverage for diabetes. Each
policy of accident and health or sickness insurance providing coverage for
health care, other than an accident-only, specified disease, hospital
indemnity, medicare supplement, long-term care, or other limited benefit health
insurance policy, that is issued or renewed in this State, shall provide
coverage for outpatient diabetes self-management training, education,
equipment, and supplies, if:

(1) The equipment, supplies, training, and education
are medically necessary; and

(2) The equipment, supplies, training, and education
are prescribed by a health care professional authorized to prescribe. [L 2000,
c 243, §2; am L 2002, c 155, §59]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next